fi: Wakeboardin lautailutyyli: Yleiskäyttö; Vene; Kaapelipuisto; Hybridi (vene ja kaapeli); Muu
fr: Style de pratique du wakeboard: Polyvalent; Bateau; Câble/téléski nautique; Hybride (bateau et câble); Autre
nb: Wakeboard-kjørestil: Allround; Båt; Kabelpark; Hybrid (båt og kabel); Annet
tr: Wakeboard sürüş stili: Çok yönlü; Tekne; Kablolu park; Hibrit (tekne ve kablo); Diğer
ko: 웨이크보드 라이딩 방식: 올어라운드; 보트; 케이블 파크; 하이브리드(보트 및 케이블); 기타
de: Wakeboard-Fahrstil: Allround; Boot; Cable Park; Hybrid (Boot & Cable); Sonstiges
cs: Styl jízdy na wakeboardu: Univerzální; Za loď; Cable park; Hybridní (loď a vlek); Jiné
el: Στυλ οδήγησης wakeboard: All-around; Σκάφος; Cable park; Υβριδικό (σκάφος & cable); Άλλο
th: สไตล์การเล่นเวคบอร์ด: อเนกประสงค์; เรือ; เคเบิลพาร์ค; ไฮบริด (เรือและเคเบิล); อื่นๆ
ru: Стиль катания на вейкборде: Универсальный; Для катера; Вейк-парк; Гибридный (катер и парк); Другое
it: Stile di utilizzo del wakeboard: Versatile; Barca; Cable park; Ibrida (barca e cable); Altro
pt-BR: Wakeboard estilo de uso: Versátil (all-around); Barco; Cable park; Híbrido (barco e cable); Outro
lt-LT: Vandenlentės važiavimo stilius: Universalus; Kateris; Vandenlenčių parkas; Hibridinis (kateris ir parkas); Kita
ja: ウェイクボードライディングスタイル: オールラウンド; ボート; ケーブルパーク; ハイブリッド (ボート・ケーブル); その他
sv: Wakeboardåkningsstil: Allround; Båt; Kabelpark; Hybrid (båt och kabel); Övrigt
da: Kørestil for wakeboard: All-around; Båd; Kabelpark; Hybrid (båd og kabel); Andet
pl: Styl jazdy na wakeboardzie: Wszechstronny (All-around); Za motorówką (Boat); Wyciąg (Cable park); Hybrydowy (motorówka i wyciąg); Inne
pt-PT: Estilo de utilização do wakeboard: Versátil; Barco; Cable park; Híbrido (barco e cable); Outro
hu: Wakeboardozási stílus: Univerzális; Hajó; Kábelpark; Hibrid (hajó és kábel); Egyéb
hr-HR: Stil vožnje wakeboarda: Svestrano; Brod; Žičara; Hibridno (brod i žičara); Ostalo
ro-RO: Stilul de utilizare a wakeboardului: All-around; Barcă; Cable park; Hibrid (barcă și cablu); Altele
sk-SK: Štýl jazdy na wakeboarde: Univerzálny; Čln; Cable park; Hybrid (čln a vlek); Iný
nl: Wakeboard rijstijl: Allround; Boot; Kabelpark; Hybride (boot & kabel); Overige
zh-TW: 滑水板騎乘風格: 全能型; 船拖型; 纜繩公園型; 混合型 (船拖和纜繩); 其他
sl-SI: Stil vožnje z wakeboardom: Vsestransko; Čoln; Žičnica (cable park); Hibridno (čoln in žičnica); Drugo
zh-CN: 滑水板滑水风格: 全能; 船牵引; 缆绳牵引; 混合（船牵引和缆绳牵引）; 其他
es: Estilo de uso de la tabla de wakeboard: Versátil; Lancha; Parque de cable; Híbrido (lancha y cable); Otro
vi: Phong cách lướt ván wakeboard: Toàn năng; Tàu thuyền; Công viên trượt nước; Lai (tàu thuyền & công viên trượt nước); Khác
en: Wakeboard riding style: All-around; Boat; Cable park; Hybrid (boat & cable); Other
bg-BG: Стил на каране на уейкборд: Универсален; За лодка; Кейбъл парк; Хибриден (лодка и кейбъл); Друго